Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 42 Threats and Extortion

11-42-1.
Excessive fees or bond demanded by public officer.

Every officer appointed by the state or by any city or town in the state, whose fees are stated by law, who shall corruptly exact or extort any more or greater fees for any service than are stated and allowed by law, or who shall corruptly levy, demand, receive, or take, under color of his or her office, any bond, bill, note, or other assurance or promise whatsoever, securing the payment of a greater sum of money for any service than he or she is authorized to demand and receive by law, shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

11-42-1

.

11-42-1.1.
Extortion by public official.

Any person, being an elected or appointed official or employee of the state, or of any political subdivision of the state, or of any city or town of the state, or representing himself or herself to be, or assuming to act as an official or employee, who, under color or pretense of office, commits or attempts to commit an act of extortion, shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned for a term of not more than fifteen (15) years or fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or both, and shall forfeit all unjust enrichment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 461, § 1.

11-42-1.2.
Kickbacks from public works projects.

Any person who by force, intimidation, or threat of procuring dismissal from employment, or loss of loan or grant from the state or political subdivision thereof or city or town, induces any person employed in the construction, completion, or repair of any public building, public work, or building or work financed in whole or in part by loans or grants by the state or any political subdivision or any city or town of the state, or any person receiving or benefiting from a grant or loan, to give up any part of the compensation to which the person is entitled under a contract of employment, shall be imprisoned for a term not more than fifteen (15) years, or be fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or both, and shall forfeit all unjust enrichment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 461, § 1.

11-42-2.
Extortion and blackmail.

Whoever, verbally or by a written or printed communication, maliciously threatens to accuse another of a crime or offense or by a verbal or written communication maliciously threatens any injury to the person, reputation, property, or financial condition of another, or threatens to engage in other criminal conduct with intent to extort money or any unlawful pecuniary advantage, or with intent to compel any person to do any act against his or her will, or to prohibit any person from carrying out a duty imposed by law, shall be punished by imprisonment in the adult correctional institutions for not more than fifteen (15) years or by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 17; P.L. 1934, ch. 2113, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

11-42-2

; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 95, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 461, § 1.

11-42-3.
Repealed.

11-42-4.
Threats to public officials.

Whoever knowingly and willfully delivers or conveys, directly or indirectly, a verbal or written threat to take the life of, or to inflict bodily harm upon, a public official or a member of his or her immediate family because of the performance or nonperformance of some public duty; because of hostility of the person making the threat toward the status or position of the public official; or because of some other factor related to the official’s public existence, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

For purposes of this section:

“Public official” means a person who is elected or appointed to office in accordance with the constitution, a statute, or a city or town charter, or who is a judge, magistrate, assistant attorney general, special assistant attorney general, or law enforcement officer, or in the case of an elective office, any person who has filed the required documents for nomination or election to that office or who is appointed by the governor to serve as the director or his or her designee of a state department that is established and the qualifications and duties of which are prescribed by statute to discharge a public duty for the state of Rhode Island;

“Immediate family” means a public official’s spouse, child, or children.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 46, § 1.

11-42-5.
Simulating legal process.

No person, firm, corporation, association, agent or employee shall in any manner coerce, intimidate, threaten, retaliate against or attempt to coerce or intimidate or threaten any public official as defined in §

11-42-4

in connection with any claim, demand or account, by the issuance, utterance or delivery of any matter, printed, typed or written, which is unauthorized by a statute or court of this state and that simulates in form and substance legal process of a court of this state.

No person shall prepare, send, deliver, issue, serve, execute, or otherwise act to further the operation of any unauthorized process.

As used in this section:

“Legal process” means a summons, complaint, pleading, writ, warrant, injunction, notice, subpoena, lien, order, or other document issued or entered by or on behalf of a court or lawful tribunal or lawfully filed with or recorded by a governmental agency that is used as a means of exercising or acquiring jurisdiction over a person or property, or a Uniform Commercial Code (UCC) or other filing with the secretary of state or any city or town recorder that creates or purports to create a lien or cloud on the title of real or personal property, or to assert or give notice of a legal claim against a person or property, or to direct persons to take or refrain from an action.

“Unauthorized process” means any of the following:

A document simulating legal process that is prepared or issued by or on behalf of an entity that purports or represents itself to be a lawful tribunal or a court, public employee, or other agency created, established, authorized, or sanctioned by law but is not a lawful tribunal or court, public officer, or other agency created, established, authorized, or sanctioned by law.

A document that by its form, wording, use of the name of the state of Rhode Island or any lawful tribunal, public employee, or subdivision thereof, use of seals or insignia, or general appearance has a tendency meant to create in the mind of the ordinary person the false impression that it has judicial or other official authorization, sanction or approval.

A document that would otherwise be legal process except that it was not authorized, issued or entered by or on behalf of a court or lawful tribunal or lawfully filed with, authorized by or recorded by a governmental agency as required by law. However, this subparagraph does not apply to a document that would otherwise be legal process but for one or more technical defects, including, but not limited to, errors involving names, spelling, addresses, or time of issue or filing or other defects that do not relate to the substance of the claim or action underlying the document.

A person who violates this section shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 108, § 1.